tests/cv-nouns.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Plural forms":
    кӗнеке<n><pl><nom> : кӗнекесем

  "Front harmony with -ӗ ending stems":
    ӳхӗ<n><nom> : ӳхӗ
    ӳхӗ<n><gen> : ӳхӗн
    ӳхӗ<n><dat> : ӳхе
    ӳхӗ<n><loc> : ӳхӗре
    ӳхӗ<n><abl> : ӳхӗрен
    ӳхӗ<n><ins> : ӳхӗпе
    ӳхӗ<n>+сӑр<post> : ӳхӗсӗр
    ӳхӗ<n><ter> : ӳхӗшӗн
    ӳхӗ<n><pl><nom> : ӳхӗсем
    ӳхӗ<n><pl><gen> : ӳхӗсен
    ӳхӗ<n><pl><dat> : ӳхӗсене
    ӳхӗ<n><pl><loc> : ӳхӗсенче
    ӳхӗ<n><pl><abl> : ӳхӗсенчен
    ӳхӗ<n><pl><ins> : ӳхӗсемпе
    ӳхӗ<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : ӳхӗсемсӗр
    ӳхӗ<n><pl><ter> : ӳхӗсемшӗн

  "Front harmony with -ӳ ending stems":
    пӗлӳ<n><nom> : пӗлӳ
    пӗлӳ<n><gen> : пӗлӗвӗн
    пӗлӳ<n><dat> : пӗлӗве
    пӗлӳ<n><loc> : пӗлӳре
    пӗлӳ<n><abl> : пӗлӳрен
    пӗлӳ<n><ins> : пӗлӳпе
    пӗлӳ<n>+сӑр<post> : пӗлӳсӗр
    пӗлӳ<n><ter> : пӗлӳшӗн
    пӗлӳ<n><pl><nom> : пӗлӳсем
    пӗлӳ<n><pl><gen> : пӗлӳсен
    пӗлӳ<n><pl><dat> : пӗлӳсене
    пӗлӳ<n><pl><loc> : пӗлӳсенче
    пӗлӳ<n><pl><abl> : пӗлӳсенчен
    пӗлӳ<n><pl><ins> : пӗлӳсемпе
    пӗлӳ<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : пӗлӳсемсӗр
    пӗлӳ<n><pl><ter> : пӗлӳсемшӗн

  "A noun ending in -у":
    ту<n><nom> : ту
    ту<n><gen> : тӑвӑн
    ту<n><dat> : тӑва
    ту<n><loc> : тура
    ту<n><abl> : туран
    ту<n><ins> : тупа
    ту<n>+сӑр<post> : тусӑр
    ту<n><ter> : тушӑн
    ту<n><pl><nom> : тусем
    ту<n><pl><gen> : тусен
    ту<n><pl><dat> : тусене
    ту<n><pl><loc> : тусенче
    ту<n><pl><abl> : тусенчен
    ту<n><pl><ins> : тусемпе
    ту<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : тусемсӗр
    ту<n><pl><ter> : тусемшӗн

  "Another noun ending in -у":
    ҫыру<n><nom> : ҫыру
    ҫыру<n><gen> : ҫырӑвӑн
    ҫыру<n><dat> : ҫырӑва
    ҫыру<n><loc> : ҫырура
    ҫыру<n><abl> : ҫыруран
    ҫыру<n><ins> : ҫырупа
    ҫыру<n>+сӑр<post> : ҫырусӑр
    ҫыру<n><ter> : ҫырушӑн
    ҫыру<n><pl><nom> : ҫырусем
    ҫыру<n><pl><gen> : ҫырусен
    ҫыру<n><pl><dat> : ҫырусене
    ҫыру<n><pl><loc> : ҫырусенче
    ҫыру<n><pl><abl> : ҫырусенчен
    ҫыру<n><pl><ins> : ҫырусемпе
    ҫыру<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : ҫырусемсӗр
    ҫыру<n><pl><ter> : ҫырусемшӗн

  "Back harmony with -а ending stems":
    ача<n><nom> : ача
    ача<n><gen> : ачан
    ача<n><dat> : ачана
    ача<n><loc> : ачара
    ача<n><abl> : ачаран
    ача<n><ins> : ачапа
    ача<n>+сӑр<post> : ачасӑр
    ача<n><ter> : ачашӑн
    ача<n><pl><nom> : ачасем
    ача<n><pl><gen> : ачасен
    ача<n><pl><dat> : ачасене
    ача<n><pl><loc> : ачасенче
    ача<n><pl><abl> : ачасенчен
    ача<n><pl><ins> : ачасемпе
    ача<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : ачасемсӗр
    ача<n><pl><ter> : ачасемшӗн

  "A noun ending in л":
    ял<n><nom> : ял
    ял<n><gen> : ялӑн
    ял<n><dat> : яла
    ял<n><loc> : ялра
    ял<n><abl> : ялран
    ял<n><abl> : ялтан
    ял<n><ins> : ялпа
    ял<n>+сӑр<post> : ялсӑр
    ял<n><ter> : ялшӑн
    ял<n><pl><nom> : ялсем
    ял<n><pl><gen> : ялсен
    ял<n><pl><dat> : ялсене
    ял<n><pl><loc> : ялсенче
    ял<n><pl><abl> : ялсенчен
    ял<n><pl><ins> : ялсемпе
    ял<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : ялсемсӗр
    ял<n><pl><ter> : ялсемшӗн

  "A noun ending in н":
    тӗн<n><nom> : тӗн
    тӗн<n><gen> : тӗнӗн
    тӗн<n><dat> : тӗне
    тӗн<n><loc> : тӗнре
    тӗн<n><abl> : тӗнрен
    тӗн<n><ins> : тӗнпе
    тӗн<n>+сӑр<post> : тӗнсӗр
    тӗн<n><ter> : тӗншӗн
    тӗн<n><pl><nom> : тӗнсем
    тӗн<n><pl><gen> : тӗнсен
    тӗн<n><pl><dat> : тӗнсене
    тӗн<n><pl><loc> : тӗнсенче
    тӗн<n><pl><abl> : тӗнсенчен
    тӗн<n><pl><ins> : тӗнсемпе
    тӗн<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : тӗнсемсӗр
    тӗн<n><pl><ter> : тӗнсемшӗн

  "A noun ending in ль":
    кукӑль<n><nom> : кукӑль
    кукӑль<n><gen> : кукӑлӗн
    кукӑль<n><dat> : кукӑле
    кукӑль<n><loc> : кукӑльре
    кукӑль<n><abl> : кукӑльрен
    кукӑль<n><abl> : кукӑльтен
    кукӑль<n><ins> : кукӑльпе
    кукӑль<n>+сӑр<post> : кукӑльсӗр
    кукӑль<n><ter> : кукӑльшӗн
    кукӑль<n><pl><nom> : кукӑльсем
    кукӑль<n><pl><gen> : кукӑльсен
    кукӑль<n><pl><dat> : кукӑльсене
    кукӑль<n><pl><loc> : кукӑльсенче
    кукӑль<n><pl><abl> : кукӑльсенчен
    кукӑль<n><pl><ins> : кукӑльсемпе
    кукӑль<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : кукӑльсемсӗр
    кукӑль<n><pl><ter> : кукӑльсемшӗн

  "A noun ending in нь":
    июнь<n><nom> : июнь
    июнь<n><gen> : июнӗн
    июнь<n><dat> : июне
    июнь<n><loc> : июньре
    июнь<n><abl> : июньрен
    июнь<n><ins> : июньпе
    июнь<n>+сӑр<post> : июньсӗр
    июнь<n><ter> : июньшӗн
    июнь<n><pl><nom> : июньсем
    июнь<n><pl><gen> : июньсен
    июнь<n><pl><dat> : июньсене
    июнь<n><pl><loc> : июньсенче
    июнь<n><pl><abl> : июньсенчен
    июнь<n><pl><ins> : июньсемпе
    июнь<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : июньсемсӗр
    июнь<n><pl><ter> : июньсемшӗн

  "A noun ending in дь":
    тетрадь<n><nom> : тетрадь
    тетрадь<n><gen> : тетрадӗн
    тетрадь<n><dat> : тетраде
    тетрадь<n><loc> : тетрадьре
    тетрадь<n><abl> : тетрадьрен
    тетрадь<n><ins> : тетрадьпе
    тетрадь<n>+сӑр<post> : тетрадьсӗр
    тетрадь<n><ter> : тетрадьшӗн
    тетрадь<n><pl><nom> : тетрадьсем
    тетрадь<n><pl><gen> : тетрадьсен
    тетрадь<n><pl><dat> : тетрадьсене
    тетрадь<n><pl><loc> : тетрадьсенче
    тетрадь<n><pl><abl> : тетрадьсенчен
    тетрадь<n><pl><ins> : тетрадьсемпе
    тетрадь<n><pl>+сӑр<post> : тетрадьсемсӗр
    тетрадь<n><pl><ter> : тетрадьсемшӗн

  "The noun анне":
    анне<n><nom> : анне
    анне<n><pl><nom> : аннесем

  "Consonant gemination":
    йытӑ<n><px3sp><nom> : йытти 

  "ччен/чен":
    автан<n>+ччен<post> : автанччен
    чӗрӗп<n>+ччен<post> : чӗрӗпчен
    ҫурт<n>+ччен<post> : ҫуртчен
    автобус<n>+ччен<post> : автобусчен
    июль<n>+ччен<post> : июльччен
    пулӑ<n>+ччен<post> : пулӑччен
    лаша<n>+ччен<post> : лашаччен
    литература<n>+ччен<post> : литературӑччен
    нефть<n>+ччен<post> : нефтьчен
    аллея<n>+ччен<post> : аллейӑччен
    министерство<n>+ччен<post> : министерствӑччен
    училище<n>+ччен<post> : училищӗччен
